Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 18 Commission on Child Support

15-18-1.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

An increasingly large percentage of children in this state live in single parent households;

Almost one-half (1/2) of single parent households have income below the poverty level;

In excess of forty thousand (40,000) children in the state are receiving state aid through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) program;

Children in families where parents are separated or divorced are at greater risk of economic deprivation than in two (2) parent families.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1.

15-18-2.
Establishment — Purpose.

There is established a commission on child support to study all aspects of child support. The study shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The number of children eligible for and/or receiving child support;

The amount of support being ordered paid by the courts and the actual amount being paid;

The methods used in determining the amount of child support;

The methods used in enforcing support orders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1.

15-18-3.
Membership.

The commission shall consist of fifteen (15) members: three (3) of whom shall be members of the house of representatives, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the speaker; two (2) of whom shall be from the senate, not more than one from the same political party, to be appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be the chief judge of the family court, or his or her designee; one of whom shall be the chairperson of the supreme court advisory committee on women in the courts; one of whom shall be a magistrate of the family court to be appointed by the chief judge of the family court; one of whom shall be the director of the department of human services or his or her designee; two (2) of whom shall be attorneys who are members of the family court bench bar committee to be appointed by the chairperson of the committee; one of whom shall be the chief counsel of the legal aid society; one of whom shall be a member of a child support advocacy group to be appointed by the governor; and two (2) members of the general public who, at their time of appointment, are custodial parents to be appointed by the governor. Members from the family court bench bar committee, members from the general public, and the member from the child support advocacy group shall serve two (2) year terms.

Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment.

The members shall annually elect, by majority vote, one of the members as chairperson, one of the members as vice-chairperson, and one of the members as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 9; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 13.

15-18-4.
Technical assistance.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents that is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1.

15-18-5.
Reports and recommendations.

The commission shall report to the general assembly at least every two (2) years its findings and the results of its studies, and shall make such recommendations to the general assembly as it deems advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 34.

15-18-6.
Place of meeting.

The speaker of the house shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the commission; provided, that the commission may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 344, § 1.